Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4780.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) The legislature recognizes that approximately 638,000 Michiganders experience substance use disorders and only about 127,600 receive treatment. Treatment refers only to a brief time of assistance, but recovery community organizations provide long-term assistance and resources to these Michiganders. Recovery community organizations provide ongoing support that significantly improves the likelihood of long-term recovery, yet these recovery community organizations are significantly underfunded in comparison to treatment programs and facilities throughout this state. (2) In recognition of Michiganders going through the recovery process and the work of recovery community organizations, the legislature declares that the second Saturday of September of each year shall be known as "Michigan's Day of Recovery".